GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-additions.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     additional lexicon entries
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, Elena Lopez Garcia
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj +Verb
+Adv +Conj

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF
+1P +2P +3P

+Inf +Imp
+PastPart +PresPart
+PInd +IInd +Perf +Pluperf 
+Fut +Cond +PSubj +FSubj


! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space

! diacritical symbols for rules
^]	! lemma boundary
^1	! delete 1 character
^2	! delete 2 characters

LEXICON ROOT 
abonado+Noun		MFSGPL;
al% menos+Adv		#;
amante+Adj		XSGPL;
amante+Noun		XSGPL;
amnistía+Noun		FSGPL;
aseguradora+Noun	FSGPL;
calibre+Noun		MSGPL;
cese+Noun		MSGPL;
clausurar+Verb		VERBar;
colectivo+Noun		MSGPL;
desplazado+Noun		MFSGPL;
dislate+Noun		MSGPL;
encuesta+Noun		FSGPL;
enganche+Noun		MSGPL;
enmienda+Noun		FSGPL;
envanecimiento+Noun	MSGPL;
escanear+Verb		VERBar;
favela+Noun		FSGPL;
fundo+Noun		MSGPL;
fax+Noun		MPL;	! singular is already in morph-base
fragmentario+Adj	MFSGPL;
hisopo+Noun		MSGPL;
implicado+Noun		MFSGPL;
inerme+Adj		XSGPL;
iris+Noun		MINV;
jubilado+Noun		MFSGPL;
justo+Adv		#;
listín+Noun		MSGPL;
llegada+Noun		FSGPL;
lustre+Noun		MSGPL;
maletín+Noun		MSGPL;
mayúsculo+Adj		MFSGPL;
nacionalista+Adj	XSGPL;
nuboso+Adj		MFSGPL;
original+Noun		MSGPL;
otoñal+Adj		XSGPL;
parche+Noun		MSGPL;
patronal+Noun		FSGPL;
pesca+Noun		FSGPL;
pesado+Adj		MFSGPL;
pista+Noun		FSGPL;
primar+Verb		VERBar;
promotor+Noun		MSGPL;
propina+Noun		FSGPL;
recluso+Noun 		MFSGPL;
reinstalar+Verb		VERBar;
romance+Noun		MSGPL;
rosa+Adj		XSGPL;
saharaui+Adj		XSGPL;
secretaría+Noun		FSGPL;
sin% embargo+Conj	#;
soporte+Noun		MSGPL;
subida+Noun		FSGPL;
tamaño+Noun		MSGPL;
tenso+Adj		MFSGPL;
trama+Noun		FSGPL;
tóner+Noun		MSGPL;


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MINV	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FINV	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFINV	MINV; FINV;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XINV	+MF+SP		#;


LEXICON VERBar
+Inf			#;	! instalar	

+Imp+2P+Sg:^1		#;	! instala
+Imp+2P+Pl:^1d		#;	! instalad
+Imp+3P+Sg:^2e		#;	! instale
+Imp+3P+Pl:^2en		#;	! instalen

+PInd+1P+Sg:^2o		#;	! instalo
+PInd+2P+Sg:^1s		#;	! instalas
+PInd+3P+Sg:^1		#;	! instala
+PInd+1P+Pl:^1mos	#;	! instalamos
+PInd+2P+Pl:^2áis	#;	! instaláis
+PInd+3P+Pl:^1n		#;	! instalan

+IInd+1P+Sg:^1ba	#;	! instalaba
+IInd+2P+Sg:^1bas	#;	! instalabas
+IInd+3P+Sg:^1ba	#;	! instalaba
+IInd+1P+Pl:^2ábamos	#;	! instalábamos
+IInd+2P+Pl:^1bais	#;	! instalabais
+IInd+3P+Pl:^1ban	#;	! instalaban

+Perf+1P+Sg:^2é		#;	! instalé
+Perf+2P+Sg:^1ste	#;	! instalaste
+Perf+3P+Sg:^2ó		#;	! instaló
+Perf+1P+Pl:^1mos	#;	! instalamos
+Perf+2P+Pl:^1steis	#;	! instalasteis
+Perf+3P+Pl:on		#;	! instalaron

+Fut+1P+Sg:é		#;	! instalaré
+Fut+2P+Sg:ás		#;	! instalarás
+Fut+3P+Sg:á		#;	! instalará
+Fut+1P+Pl:emos		#;	! instalaremos
+Fut+2P+Pl:éis		#;	! instalaréis
+Fut+3P+Pl:án		#;	! instalarán

+Cond+1P+Sg:ía		#;	! instalaría
+Cond+2P+Sg:ías		#;	! instalarías
+Cond+3P+Sg:ía		#;	! instalaría
+Cond+1P+Pl:íamos	#;	! instalaríamos
+Cond+2P+Pl:íais	#;	! instalaríais
+Cond+3P+Pl:ían		#;	! instalarían

+PSubj+1P+Sg:^2e	#;	! instale
+PSubj+2P+Sg:^2es	#;	! instales
+PSubj+3P+Sg:^2e	#;	! instale
+PSubj+1P+Pl:^2emos	#;	! instalemos
+PSubj+2P+Pl:^2éis	#;	! instaléis
+PSubj+3P+Pl:^2en	#;	! instalen

+Pluperf+1P+Sg:a	#;	! instalara
+Pluperf+2P+Sg:as	#;	! instalaras
+Pluperf+3P+Sg:a	#;	! instalara
+Pluperf+1P+Pl:^2áramos	#;	! instaláramos
+Pluperf+2P+Pl:ais	#;	! instalarais
+Pluperf+3P+Pl:an	#;	! instalaran

+Pluperf+1P+Sg:^1se	#;	! instalase
+Pluperf+2P+Sg:^1ses	#;	! instalases
+Pluperf+3P+Sg:^1se	#;	! instalase
+Pluperf+1P+Pl:^2ásemos	#;	! instalásemos
+Pluperf+2P+Pl:^2áseis	#;	! instaláseis
+Pluperf+3P+Pl:^1sen	#;	! instalasen

+FSubj+1P+Sg:e		#;	! instalare
+FSubj+2P+Sg:es		#;	! instalares
+FSubj+3P+Sg:e		#;	! instalare
+FSubj+1P+Pl:^2áremos	#;	! instaláremos
+FSubj+2P+Pl:eis	#;	! instalareis
+FSubj+3P+Pl:en		#;	! instalaren

+PresPart:^1ndo		#;	! instalando
+PastPart:^1do		#;	! instalado
+PastPart:^1do^]	MFSGPL;	! instalado, -da, -dos, -das
		
